Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PAYMENT IN LIEU OF TAXES ON NATURAL RESOURCE LANDS; REPORT.new text end new text begin By December 1, 2026, the commissioner of natural resources, in cooperation with the commissioners of revenue and management and budget, and stakeholders, including representatives from affected local units of government and other interested parties, must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over natural resources and tax policy and finance with recommended changes to payment in lieu of taxes for natural resource lands under Minnesota Statutes, sections 477A.11 to 477A.14. The report must include an analysis of the current payment and distribution system and any recommended changes, including an analysis of the: new text end new text begin (1) rate of payments for specific classes of natural resource lands; new text end new text begin (2) adequacy of payments to local units of government to offset the tax revenue that would have been collected if the lands were in private ownership; and new text end new text begin (3) current funding for payments and the impact of additional land acquisition on the funding. new text end